Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.170

Authority of director.

The director or the director's designee has the following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) To enter into contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter; and

(3) To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice.

[ 2007 c 256 s 8; 2002 c 86 s 246; 1995 c 277 s 35; 1991 c 328 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.